sinhala.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
ConsStem;
ShortAStem;
LongAStem;

LEXICON ConsNoun #;
+N+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg:හි #;

LEXICON ShortANoun
+N+Nom+Sg:0 #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ක් #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ො #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ෝ #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ු #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:න් #;
+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:න්ව #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Inanim:ුන්ව #;
+N+Dat+Sg:ට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:කට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:න්ට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වලට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වාල්වලට #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙඞ් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Indef+Sg+Anim:කින් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:ඟෙඞ #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:න්ගෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ෙන් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වලින් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල්වලින් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ගෙ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:ඟෙ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:න්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වල්වල #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ක #;
+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේ #;
+N+Voc+Pl+Anim:නෙ #;
+N+Voc+Pl:නේ #;

LEXICON LongANoun
+N+Nom+Sg:ා #;
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ො #;
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ෝ #;
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:න් #;
ා+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
ා+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:න්ව #;
ා+N+Dat+Sg:ාට #;
ා+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:න්ට #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ගෙන් #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:න්ගෙන් #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ෙන් #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගෙ #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ාගේ #;
ා+N+Voc+Pl+Anim:නෙ #;
ා+N+Voc+Pl:නේ #;

Remove LongNoun
ා+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ාක් #;
ා+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:ු #;
ා+N+Acc+Pl+Inanim:ුන්ව #;
ා+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ාකට #;
ා+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:ාවලට #;
ා+N+Dat+Pl+infantilism:ාවාල්වලට #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Anim:ාගෙඞ් #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Indef+Sg+Anim:ාකින් #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Anim:ාඟෙඞ #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:ාවලින් #;
ා+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:ාවල්වලින් #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:ඟෙ #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:න්ගේ #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:ේ #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වල්වල #;
ා+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ාක #;
ා+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේ #;

LEXICON ConsStem
fප්ලුවොසිලිකේට ConsNoun;
fපෛබි‍්‍රන ConsNoun;
අක්වක ConsNoun;
අඟල ConsNoun;
අත්කම ConsNoun;
අප්රේල ConsNoun;
අභිරහස ConsNoun;
අයිඕඑස ConsNoun;
අර්ගස්ටෙරොල ConsNoun;
අල්ලාගත ConsNoun;
අසර්‍බයිජාන ConsNoun;
ආකේයොප්ටෙරික්ස ConsNoun;
ආනින ConsNoun;
ආසනයිඩ ConsNoun;
ඇකනයිට ConsNoun;
ඇග්ලුටිනෝජන ConsNoun;
ඇත්දත ConsNoun;
ඇන්ඩ‍්‍රඩයිට ConsNoun;
ඇමරිකාවන ConsNoun;
ඇමෝනියම ConsNoun;
ඇල්බියුමින ConsNoun;
ඇස්බැස්ටෝස ConsNoun;
ඉට්ටි‍්‍රයම ConsNoun;
ඉපැයුම ConsNoun;
උඩිස ConsNoun;
ඌරු මස ConsNoun;
එපඩි‍්‍රන ConsNoun;
ඒකච්ඡන්දයෙන ConsNoun;
ඔබ්බෙන ConsNoun;
ඔස්ටෙනයිට ConsNoun;
ඕසෝනයිඩ ConsNoun;
කන්දල ConsNoun;
කර්පන්ටයින ConsNoun;
ක්ලින්කර ConsNoun;
ක්ලෝරොපෝම ConsNoun;
ක්‍රාත ConsNoun;
ක්‍රෝමටින ConsNoun;
කාබොරන්ඩම ConsNoun;
කැනෝපස ConsNoun;
කැල්සයිට ConsNoun;
කිඩාරම ConsNoun;
කීට්ශ ConsNoun;
කූලෝම ConsNoun;
කේක ConsNoun;
කොන්සල ConsNoun;
කොර්නෙල ConsNoun;
කෝඩයිට ConsNoun;
ගම්මිරිස ConsNoun;
ග්ලිසරීන ConsNoun;
ග්‍රීනකයිට ConsNoun;
ගැලුම ConsNoun;
ගුගුල ConsNoun;
ගෞරවයෙන ConsNoun;
චෙස ConsNoun;
ජිහාඩ ConsNoun;
ටජික ConsNoun;
ට්වීඩ ConsNoun;
ටැනින ConsNoun;
ටෙනර ConsNoun;
ටොන්සිල ConsNoun;
ඩ්‍යුරැලුමින ConsNoun;
ඩෙක්ස්ට්‍රෝස ConsNoun;
තයිමොල ConsNoun;
තැල්ලියම ConsNoun;
තෙත්බිම ConsNoun;
දාගැබ ConsNoun;
දුම ConsNoun;
නට්ටම ConsNoun;
නයිලෝන ConsNoun;
නිමහම ConsNoun;
නෙක්ටන ConsNoun;
පටනූල ConsNoun;
පයිරනොමිසෙටේස ConsNoun;
පව ConsNoun;
ප්ලුවොරීන ConsNoun;
ප්‍රිමාටේෂ ConsNoun;
ප්‍රෝටොඇක්ටිනියම ConsNoun;
පැදුම ConsNoun;
පැලිම්ප්සෙස්ට ConsNoun;
පිරිමිඩින ConsNoun;
පුටුඹක ConsNoun;
පෙක්ටින ConsNoun;
පෙරසැරියන ConsNoun;
පොරොන්දම ConsNoun;
පෝමලින ConsNoun;
බයුටයිල ConsNoun;
බ්ලිප ConsNoun;
බැකස ConsNoun;
බැවුන ConsNoun;
බුලත ConsNoun;
බෙරිල ConsNoun;
බේරීයම ConsNoun;
බෲනට ConsNoun;
මංමාවත ConsNoun;
මරුත ConsNoun;
මාජරින ConsNoun;
මැග්නසයිට ConsNoun;
මිග්‍රේන ConsNoun;
මිලිවොට ConsNoun;
මුස්ලින ConsNoun;
මෙලනින ConsNoun;
මොනොසැක්‍රයිඩ ConsNoun;
මෝසම ConsNoun;
යුතුකම ConsNoun;
රටදෙල ConsNoun;
රාෆ ConsNoun;
රෙඩ්ල ConsNoun;
රොන ConsNoun;
ලයිනින ConsNoun;
ලිංගුස ConsNoun;
ලීක්ස ConsNoun;
ලෙවුන ConsNoun;
වඩුබාස ConsNoun;
වල්කනයිට ConsNoun;
වාර්නිස ConsNoun;
වැහැප ConsNoun;
විසැඳුම ConsNoun;
වේවැල ConsNoun;
ශිරස ConsNoun;
සංඛ්‍යාවක ConsNoun;
සන ConsNoun;
සයනජන ConsNoun;
සයිලීන ConsNoun;
සල්ලාලකම ConsNoun;
ස්කෙබීස ConsNoun;
ස්ටෙ‍්‍රප්ටොමයිසින ConsNoun;
සායම ConsNoun;
සැන්තොපිල ConsNoun;
සිටේ‍්‍රට ConsNoun;
සියොත ConsNoun;
සීනක්කාරම ConsNoun;
සුපර්මෑන ConsNoun;
සෙනගෝල ConsNoun;
සෙලුලොයිඩ ConsNoun;
හත ConsNoun;
හයිපොක්ලෝරයිට ConsNoun;
හැමිල්ටන ConsNoun;
හිල ConsNoun;
හොන්ඩුරාස ConsNoun;
ෆෝමලින ConsNoun;
LEXICON ShortAStem
අගතිය ShortANoun;
අණ්වීක්ෂණය ShortANoun;
අතුණුබහන ShortANoun;
අධිවර්ධය ShortANoun;
අන්තහ්ප්ලාස්මය ShortANoun;
අනුතාපය ShortANoun;
අනුසන්කරය ShortANoun;
අපවාහය ShortANoun;
අභ්‍යුපගමනය ShortANoun;
අම්ල ShortANoun;
අර්ඵෝද්ධාරය ShortANoun;
අවතලය ShortANoun;
අව්‍යාජත්වය ShortANoun;
අසංස්ථිතිය ShortANoun;
අහම්බය ShortANoun;
ආඥාපනත ShortANoun;
ආපාත ShortANoun;
ආලෝකනය ShortANoun;
ඇගයුම ShortANoun;
ඇඹුල්බව ShortANoun;
ඉණිමඟ ShortANoun;
ඉස්කුරුප්පුව ShortANoun;
උණ ShortANoun;
උද්‍යානය ShortANoun;
උපබෙදුම ShortANoun;
උභයවේගිතාව ShortANoun;
ඌහනය ShortANoun;
එසෙම්බලරය ShortANoun;
ඔටෝග්‍රාපය ShortANoun;
කට ShortANoun;
කථානායක ShortANoun;
කමිසය ShortANoun;
කල්පනාව ShortANoun;
ක්වන්ද්‍රාන්තුව ShortANoun;
ක්‍රියාවිශේෂණය ShortANoun;
කාලකණ්ණිකම ShortANoun;
කැල්වින්වාදය ShortANoun;
කුක්කුර ShortANoun;
කුසිම ShortANoun;
කේතාංකය ShortANoun;
කොලොම්‍බියාව ShortANoun;
ගඟ ShortANoun;
ගරුතය ShortANoun;
ග්‍රේඩය ShortANoun;
ගිලන්බව ShortANoun;
ගෙඳ ShortANoun;
ඝන්ටාතරංගය ShortANoun;
චෂකය ShortANoun;
චෞරභාෂාව ShortANoun;
ජම්බාලිය ShortANoun;
ජාලාකර්මය ShortANoun;
ටැකිමීටරය ShortANoun;
ඩෙසිමීටරය ShortANoun;
තඹුරුවනය ShortANoun;
ත්‍රිකෝණකරණය ShortANoun;
තැන්පතුව ShortANoun;
තුන්මාසය ShortANoun;
තොරොයිඩය ShortANoun;
දර්ශය ShortANoun;
ද්විලෝහ ShortANoun;
දැඩිදැව ShortANoun;
දිලියුම ShortANoun;
දුර්වලත්වය ShortANoun;
දෙය ShortANoun;
ධනේශ්වරවාදය ShortANoun;
නකුල ShortANoun;
නශ්‍ය ShortANoun;
නැකත ShortANoun;
නින්දගම ShortANoun;
නිරවහනය ShortANoun;
නිවාස ShortANoun;
නීචකම ShortANoun;
නොතන්සිහියාව ShortANoun;
පටුබුද්ධික ShortANoun;
පම්පරාව ShortANoun;
පරායත්තාවය ShortANoun;
පරිභ්ර ShortANoun;
පලාත ShortANoun;
ප්ලැංචෙට්ටුව ShortANoun;
ප්‍රත්‍යවලෝකන ShortANoun;
ප්‍රතිපක්ෂණය ShortANoun;
ප්‍රතිශිඛරය ShortANoun;
ප්‍රභින්නතාව ShortANoun;
ප්‍රවේණිය ShortANoun;
ප්‍රාදුර්භාවය ShortANoun;
පාණිග්‍රහණය ShortANoun;
පාලනක්‍රමය ShortANoun;
පැහැයුම ShortANoun;
පියෝඩය ShortANoun;
පිළිවෙළ ShortANoun;
පුනරුදය ShortANoun;
පූජ්‍යපදය ShortANoun;
පෙරකලාසිය ShortANoun;
පොලීසිය ShortANoun;
බනියන ShortANoun;
බහුත්වය ShortANoun;
බැඳිය ShortANoun;
බීජාණුධානිය ShortANoun;
බේරුම ShortANoun;
භාග ShortANoun;
භෙක්ටාරය ShortANoun;
මණ්ඩපය ShortANoun;
මන්ද්‍ර ShortANoun;
මලමූත්‍ර ShortANoun;
මාංශය ShortANoun;
මාරුකුරුව ShortANoun;
මිත්‍රසම්මුතිය ShortANoun;
මුඛ්‍යධමනිය ShortANoun;
මුළුව ShortANoun;
මෙගස්පොරොපිල ShortANoun;
මෞලිකය ShortANoun;
යාඥය ShortANoun;
රංජකය ShortANoun;
රවුළ ShortANoun;
රාශිභූත ShortANoun;
රූටනය ShortANoun;
ලාලිකාව ShortANoun;
වජ්ජ ShortANoun;
වලිගය ShortANoun;
වාදක ShortANoun;
විකිරණවේදය ShortANoun;
විපරිතතාව ShortANoun;
විවිධාංගීකරණය ShortANoun;
වීරාව ShortANoun;
ශබ්දවිද්‍යාව ShortANoun;
ශිලාලිපිය ShortANoun;
සංඝනන ShortANoun;
සක්‍රියනය ShortANoun;
සමකාල්‍යය ShortANoun;
සමාග්‍රහණය ShortANoun;
සරූපතාව ShortANoun;
ස්ථුලබව ShortANoun;
සාධකාත්මක ShortANoun;
සිඟුව ShortANoun;
සුරකුව ShortANoun;
සොව ShortANoun;
හැරවුම ShortANoun;
ළතෝනිය ShortANoun;
LEXICON LongAStem
අග්‍රධරය LongANoun;
අණුකය LongANoun;
අතුරන්න LongANoun;
අධිනීතිඥය LongANoun;
අන්තේවාසිකය LongANoun;
අනීශ්වරවාදිය LongANoun;
අනුවරය LongANoun;
අපසහායකය LongANoun;
අභ්‍යාවකාශගාමිය LongANoun;
අම LongANoun;
අයාලය LongANoun;
අල්ලන්න LongANoun;
අව LongANoun;
අසන්න LongANoun;
අහස්‍යාත්‍රිකය LongANoun;
ආඥාදායකය LongANoun;
ආදිශිෂ්‍යය LongANoun;
ආරක්ෂණවාදිය LongANoun;
ආවශ්‍යකත LongANoun;
ඇණිකරුව LongANoun;
ඇබිත්‍ය LongANoun;
ඇවිදිනව LongANoun;
ඉත්තෑව LongANoun;
ඉබ්බ LongANoun;
ඉහදමනව LongANoun;
උණහපුළුව LongANoun;
උපගුරුවරය LongANoun;
උපාසකය LongANoun;
ඌරුමීය LongANoun;
එපෙන්ඩයිම LongANoun;
ඔටුව LongANoun;
ඕටව LongANoun;
කඟවේන LongANoun;
කඩාගන්නව LongANoun;
කප්පිත්ත LongANoun;
කරන්න LongANoun;
කල LongANoun;
කවුඩ LongANoun;
ක්ධල්ලික LongANoun;
කාදිනල්තුම LongANoun;
කාවද්දනව LongANoun;
කැපොත්ත LongANoun;
කින්යර්වන්ඩ LongANoun;
කිරිදරුව LongANoun;
කුණ LongANoun;
කුරුමිට්ට LongANoun;
කුහකය LongANoun;
කෙකරගානව LongANoun;
කොකුසය LongANoun;
කොබෙයිය LongANoun;
කෝනංගිය LongANoun;
ගනුදෙනුකරුව LongANoun;
ගවේශකය LongANoun;
ගාන්ධර්වය LongANoun;
ගැල්කරුව LongANoun;
ගුඩ්ඩ LongANoun;
ගෙවලය LongANoun;
ගොළුව LongANoun;
චන්ද්‍රය LongANoun;
චීන LongANoun;
ජනත LongANoun;
ජාරය LongANoun;
ටිරැනසෝරය LongANoun;
ඩාඩ LongANoun;
තක්සේරුකාරය LongANoun;
තරගකරුව LongANoun;
ත්‍යක්තාපත්‍යය LongANoun;
තාරකාවේදිය LongANoun;
තිරිසන LongANoun;
තුලනීක්ෂිතය LongANoun;
තෝරන්න LongANoun;
දලඹුව LongANoun;
දානදායකය LongANoun;
දිගඅරිනව LongANoun;
දිවිමකුළුව LongANoun;
දුෂ්ටය LongANoun;
දේවගැතිය LongANoun;
දෛවඥය LongANoun;
ධර්මදේශකය LongANoun;
නඩුකියන්න LongANoun;
නරවෘකය LongANoun;
නළියනව LongANoun;
නායකය LongANoun;
නෑන LongANoun;
නියැළෙනව LongANoun;
නිෂ්ප්‍රභ LongANoun;
පක්ෂිය LongANoun;
පන්තලෝන LongANoun;
පරිවාරකය LongANoun;
ප්‍රජාතන්ත්‍රවාදිය LongANoun;
ප්‍රධානිය LongANoun;
ප්‍රියවයස්‍යය LongANoun;
පැංච LongANoun;
පිටිසරය LongANoun;
පීඨකාධිපතිය LongANoun;
පුලින්දය LongANoun;
පෙභෙර LongANoun;
පොලිස්කාරය LongANoun;
බන්ධුවරය LongANoun;
බලුමැක්‍ක LongANoun;
බැක්ටීරිය LongANoun;
බුරනව LongANoun;
භද්‍ර LongANoun;
මගිය LongANoun;
මනුෂ්‍යය LongANoun;
මසුර LongANoun;
මාම LongANoun;
මිණිතඥය LongANoun;
මුනුපුර LongANoun;
මෛථූනිකය LongANoun;
යතුගානව LongANoun;
යොරූබ LongANoun;
රසායනඥය LongANoun;
රිකෙට්සිය LongANoun;
ලගිනව LongANoun;
ලෙවීවරය LongANoun;
වටපණුව LongANoun;
වර්ගය LongANoun;
ව්‍යාජමානිය LongANoun;
වැඩිමල LongANoun;
විජ්ජුලත LongANoun;
වියන්න LongANoun;
වීණ LongANoun;
වෛද්‍යවරය LongANoun;
ශාන්තිවාදිය LongANoun;
ශෝන LongANoun;
සංහිත LongANoun;
සන්ධිභේදකය LongANoun;
සමුද්‍රගාමිය LongANoun;
සහායකය LongANoun;
සාදන්න LongANoun;
සැවුළ LongANoun;
සිරියානුව LongANoun;
සුවඳතල LongANoun;
සේවීජනය LongANoun;
හඹනව LongANoun;
හිඟන්න LongANoun;
හෝතඹය LongANoun;
